Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-379
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-379 to 77-385 shall be known and may be cited as the Tax Expenditure Reporting Act.

Laws 1979, LB 17, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1979, § 77-353;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 82, § 1.